rules/utils/dicts/en_AU.aff
SFX Q Y 88
SFX Q 0 tise a 
SFX Q e ise [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilise [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ise [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ise um 
SFX Q 0 ise [^u]m 
SFX Q s se is 
SFX Q 0 ise [^i]s 
SFX Q y ise [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ise [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ise [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tises a 
SFX Q e ises [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilises [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ises [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ises um 
SFX Q 0 ises [^u]m 
SFX Q s ses is 
SFX Q 0 ises [^i]s 
SFX Q y ises [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ises [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ises [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tised a 
SFX Q e ised [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilised [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ised [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ised um 
SFX Q 0 ised [^u]m 
SFX Q s sed is 
SFX Q 0 ised [^i]s 
SFX Q y ised [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ised [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ised [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tising a 
SFX Q e ising [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilising [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ising [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ising um 
SFX Q 0 ising [^u]m 
SFX Q s sing is 
SFX Q 0 ising [^i]s 
SFX Q y ising [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ising [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ising [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tize a 
SFX Q e ize [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilize [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ize [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ize um 
SFX Q 0 ize [^u]m 
SFX Q s ze is 
SFX Q 0 ize [^i]s 
SFX Q y ize [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ize [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ize [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tizes a 
SFX Q e izes [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilizes [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e izes [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um izes um 
SFX Q 0 izes [^u]m 
SFX Q s zes is 
SFX Q 0 izes [^i]s 
SFX Q y izes [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 izes [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 izes [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tized a 
SFX Q e ized [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilized [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ized [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ized um 
SFX Q 0 ized [^u]m 
SFX Q s zed is 
SFX Q 0 ized [^i]s 
SFX Q y ized [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ized [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ized [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tizing a 
SFX Q e izing [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilizing [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e izing [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um izing um 
SFX Q 0 izing [^u]m 
SFX Q s zing is 
SFX Q 0 izing [^i]s 
SFX Q y izing [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 izing [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 izing [^aemsy] 
SFX q Y 44
SFX q 0 tisation a 
SFX q e isation [^l]e 
SFX q le ilisation [^aeiou]le 
SFX q e isation [aeiou]le 
SFX q um isation um 
SFX q 0 isation [^u]m 
SFX q s sation is 
SFX q 0 isation [^i]s 
SFX q y isation [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isation [aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isation [^aemsy] 
SFX q 0 tisations a 
SFX q e isations [^l]e 
SFX q le ilisations [^aeiou]le 
SFX q e isations [aeiou]le 
SFX q um isations um 
SFX q 0 isations [^u]m 
SFX q s sations is 
SFX q 0 isations [^i]s 
SFX q y isations [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isations [aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isations [^aemsy] 
SFX q 0 tization a 
SFX q e ization [^l]e 
SFX q le ilization [^aeiou]le 
SFX q e ization [aeiou]le 
SFX q um ization um 
SFX q 0 ization [^u]m 
SFX q s zation is 
SFX q 0 ization [^i]s 
SFX q y ization [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 ization [aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 ization [^aemsy] 
SFX q 0 tizations a 
SFX q e izations [^l]e 
SFX q le ilizations [^aeiou]le 
SFX q e izations [aeiou]le 
SFX q um izations um 
SFX q 0 izations [^u]m 
SFX q s zations is 
SFX q 0 izations [^i]s 
SFX q y izations [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 izations [aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 izations [^aemsy] 
SFX s Y 66
SFX s 0 tiser a 
SFX s e iser [^l]e 
SFX s le iliser [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e iser [aeiou]le 
SFX s um iser um 
SFX s 0 iser [^u]m 
SFX s s ser is 
SFX s 0 iser [^i]s 
SFX s y iser [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 tisers a 
SFX s e isers [^l]e 
SFX s le ilisers [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e isers [aeiou]le 
SFX s um isers um 
SFX s 0 isers [^u]m 
SFX s s sers is 
SFX s 0 isers [^i]s 
SFX s y isers [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 isers [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 isers [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 tiser's a 
SFX s e iser's [^l]e 
SFX s le iliser's [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e iser's [aeiou]le 
SFX s um iser's um 
SFX s 0 iser's [^u]m 
SFX s s ser's is 
SFX s 0 iser's [^i]s 
SFX s y iser's [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser's [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser's [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 tizer a 
SFX s e izer [^l]e 
SFX s le ilizer [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e izer [aeiou]le 
SFX s um izer um 
SFX s 0 izer [^u]m 
SFX s s zer is 
SFX s 0 izer [^i]s 
SFX s y izer [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 izer [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 izer [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 tizers a 
SFX s e izers [^l]e 
SFX s le ilizers [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e izers [aeiou]le 
SFX s um izers um 
SFX s 0 izers [^u]m 
SFX s s zers is 
SFX s 0 izers [^i]s 
SFX s y izers [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 izers [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 izers [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 tizer's a 
SFX s e izer's [^l]e 
SFX s le ilizer's [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e izer's [aeiou]le 
SFX s um izer's um 
SFX s 0 izer's [^u]m 
SFX s s zer's is 
SFX s 0 izer's [^i]s 
SFX s y izer's [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 izer's [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 izer's [^aemsy] 
SFX t Y 44
SFX t 0 tisable a 
SFX t e isable [^l]e 
SFX t le ilisable [^aeiou]le 
SFX t e isable [aeiou]le 
SFX t um isable um 
SFX t 0 isable [^u]m 
SFX t s sable is 
SFX t 0 isable [^i]s 
SFX t y isable [^aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isable [aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isable [^aemsy] 
SFX t 0 tizable a 
SFX t e izable [^l]e 
SFX t le ilizable [^aeiou]le 
SFX t e izable [aeiou]le 
SFX t um izable um 
SFX t 0 izable [^u]m 
SFX t s zable is 
SFX t 0 izable [^i]s 
SFX t y izable [^aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 izable [aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 izable [^aemsy] 
SFX t 0 tisability a 
SFX t e isability [^l]e 
SFX t le ilisability [^aeiou]le 
SFX t e isability [aeiou]le 
SFX t um isability um 
SFX t 0 isability [^u]m 
SFX t s sability is 
SFX t 0 isability [^i]s 
SFX t y isability [^aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isability [aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isability [^aemsy] 
SFX t 0 tizability a 
SFX t e izability [^l]e 
SFX t le ilizability [^aeiou]le 
SFX t e izability [aeiou]le 
SFX t um izability um 
SFX t 0 izability [^u]m 
SFX t s zability is 
SFX t 0 izability [^i]s 
SFX t y izability [^aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 izability [aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 izability [^aemsy] 
SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 's . 
SFX B Y 48
SFX B e able [^acegilotu]e 
SFX B 0 able [acegilou]e 
SFX B te ble ate 
SFX B e able [^a]te 
SFX B 0 bable [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX B 0 dable [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX B 0 fable [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX B 0 gable [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX B 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX B 0 mable [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX B 0 nable [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX B 0 pable [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX B 0 rable [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX B 0 sable [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX B 0 table [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX B 0 vable [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX B 0 zable [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX B 0 able [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B 0 able [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B y iable [^aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 able [aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 able [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy] 
SFX B e ability [^acegilotu]e 
SFX B 0 ability [acegilou]e 
SFX B te bility ate 
SFX B e ability [^a]te 
SFX B 0 bability [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX B 0 dability [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX B 0 fability [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX B 0 gability [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX B 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX B 0 mability [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX B 0 nability [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX B 0 pability [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX B 0 rability [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX B 0 sability [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX B 0 tability [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX B 0 vability [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX B 0 zability [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX B 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B 0 ability [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B y iability [^aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 ability [aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 ability [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy] 
SFX 7 Y 9
SFX 7 e able [acegilou]e 
SFX 7 0 able [^acegilou]e 
SFX 7 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 7 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 7 0 able [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX 7 0 able [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX 7 y iable [^aeiou]y 
SFX 7 0 able [aeiou]y 
SFX 7 0 able [^cely] 
SFX g Y 9
SFX g e ability [^acegilou]e 
SFX g 0 ability [acegilou]e 
SFX g 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX g 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX g 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX g 0 ability [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX g y iability [^aeiou]y 
SFX g 0 ability [aeiou]y 
SFX g 0 ability [^cely] 
SFX l Y 9
SFX l e ably [^acegilou]e 
SFX l 0 ably [acegilou]e 
SFX l 0 kably [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX l 0 lably [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX l 0 ably [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX l 0 ably [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX l y iably [^aeiou]y 
SFX l 0 ably [aeiou]y 
SFX l 0 ably [^cely] 
SFX b Y 3
SFX b e ible [^aeiou]e 
SFX b 0 ible [aeiou]e 
SFX b 0 ible [^e] 
